Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 79.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3601
Terms, defined.

For purposes of the Tuberculosis Detection and Prevention Act:

(1) Communicable tuberculosis means tuberculosis manifested by a laboratory report of sputum or other body fluid or excretion found to contain tubercle bacilli or by chest X-ray findings interpreted as active tuberculosis by competent medical authority;

(2) Department means the Department of Health and Human Services;

(3) Directed health measure means any measure, whether prophylactic or remedial, intended and directed to prevent, treat, or limit the spread of tuberculosis;

(4) Facility means a structure in which suitable isolation for tuberculosis can be given and which is approved by the department for the detention of recalcitrant tuberculous persons;

(5) Local health officer means (a) the health director of a local public health department as defined in section 71-1626 or (b) the medical advisor to the board of health of a county, city, or village;

(6) Recalcitrant tuberculous person means a person affected with tuberculosis in an active stage who by his or her conduct or mode of living endangers the health and well-being of other persons, by exposing them to tuberculosis, and who refuses to accept adequate treatment; and

(7) State health officer means the chief medical officer as described in section 81-3115.

Laws 1963, c. 399, § 1, p. 1273;

Laws 1982, LB 566, § 6;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 657;

Laws 2004, LB 1005, § 88;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 576;

Laws 2009, LB195, § 79.
August 30, 2009